Ohio, session 136, HB99.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 3901.96 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 3901.96. (A) As used in this section, a "nonprofit 6
agricultural membership organization" means an organization or 7
an affiliate of an organization that meets both of the 8
following: 9
(1) The organization was incorporated in this state on or 10
before December 31, 1919, for the purpose of promoting the 11
interests of farmers in this state. 12
(2) The organization provides healthcare benefit coverage 13
exclusively to members of the organization and the members' 14
families pursuant to contracts between the members and the 15
organization or its affiliate. 16

H. B. No. 99 Page 2
As Introduced
(B) A nonprofit agricultural membership organization is 17
not subject to Title XXXIX or Chapter 1751. of the Revised Code 18
or the jurisdiction of the superintendent of insurance. 19
Healthcare benefit coverage provided by a nonprofit agricultural 20
membership organization to the organization's members is not 21
insurance and is not a health benefit contract under any law of 22
this state. 23
(C) The risks arising out of healthcare benefit coverage 24
provided by a nonprofit agricultural membership organization may 25
be assumed or reinsured by a company authorized to conduct the 26
business of insurance in this state. 27